Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.830

Olympic natural resources center—Funding—Contracts.

The center may solicit gifts, grants, conveyances, bequests, and devises, whether real or personal property, or both, in trust or otherwise, to be directed to the center for carrying out the purposes of the center. The center may solicit contracts for work, financial and in-kind contributions, and support from private industries, interest groups, federal and state sources, and other sources. It may also use separately appropriated funds of the University of Washington for the center's activities.

[ 1991 c 316 s 4. Formerly RCW 76.12.230.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 316: See note following RCW 43.30.800.